District of Columbia statutes.
7-144

Construction.

Each and every provision of this subchapter shall be constructed liberally in aid of the powers vested in the public authorities looking to the protection of the public health, comfort, and welfare and not by way of limitation.

Aug. 11, 1939, ch. 601, § 14
Aug. 8, 1946, 60 Stat. 922, ch. 871, § 2
Oct. 11, 1963, 77 Stat. 246, Pub. L. 88-137, § 1
Medical care and treatment, requirement to obtain, see § 38-606.
1981 Ed., § 6-130.
1973 Ed., § 6-119k.